District of Columbia statutes.
32-1412

Repealed

“Secretary of Labor” defined.

Repealed.

May 21, 1946, 60 Stat. 207, ch. 267, § 12
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2012(k), 62 DCR 10905
1981 Ed., § 36-414.
1973 Ed., § 36-132.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(k) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 20-256, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 2259).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(k) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-579, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1258, 21 STAT 724).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 2(k) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-16, Mar. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 3847, 21 DCSTAT 843).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 2012(k) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).